Nebraska, session 109, LB141.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB141 LB141
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 28-710, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
28-710 (1) Sections 28-710 to 28-727 and section 2 of this act shall
be known and may be cited as the Child Protection and Family Safety Act.
(2) For purposes of the Child Protection and Family Safety Act:
(a) Alternative response means a comprehensive assessment of (i)
child safety, (ii) the risk of future child abuse or neglect, (iii)
family strengths and needs, and (iv) the provision of or referral for
necessary services and support. Alternative response is an alternative to
traditional response and does not include an investigation or a formal
determination as to whether child abuse or neglect has occurred, and the
subject of the report shall not be entered into the central registry of
child protection cases maintained pursuant to section 28-718;
(b) Child abuse or neglect means knowingly, intentionally, or
negligently causing or permitting a minor child to be:
(i) Placed in a situation that endangers his or her life or physical
or mental health;
(ii) Cruelly confined or cruelly punished;
(iii) Deprived of necessary food, clothing, shelter, or care;
(iv) Left unattended in a motor vehicle if such minor child is six
years of age or younger;
(v) Placed in a situation to be sexually abused;
(vi) Placed in a situation to be sexually exploited through sex
trafficking of a minor as defined in section 28-830 or by allowing,
encouraging, or forcing such person to engage in debauchery, public
indecency, or obscene or pornographic photography, films, or depictions;
or
(vii) Placed in a situation to be a trafficking victim as defined in
section 28-830;
(c) Child advocacy center means a community-based organization that
(i) provides an appropriate site for conducting forensic interviews as
-2-

LB141 LB141
2025 2025
defined in section 28-728 and referring victims of child abuse or neglect
and appropriate caregivers for such victims to needed evaluation,
services, and supports, (ii) assists county attorneys in facilitating
case reviews, developing and updating protocols, and arranging training
opportunities for the teams established pursuant to sections 28-728 and
28-729, and (iii) is a member, in good standing, of a state chapter as
defined in 34 U.S.C. 20302;
(d) Comprehensive assessment means an analysis of child safety, risk
of future child abuse or neglect, and family strengths and needs on a
report of child abuse or neglect using an evidence-informed and validated
tool. Comprehensive assessment does not include a finding as to whether
the child abuse or neglect occurred but does determine the need for
services and support, if any, to address the safety of children and the
risk of future abuse or neglect;
(e) Department means the Department of Health and Human Services;
(f) Investigation means fact gathering by the department, using an
evidence-informed and validated tool, or by law enforcement related to
the current safety of a child and the risk of future child abuse or
neglect that determines whether child abuse or neglect has occurred and
whether child protective services are needed;
(g) Kin caregiver means a person with whom a child in foster care
has been placed or with whom a child is residing pursuant to a temporary
living arrangement in a non-court-involved case, who has previously lived
with or is a trusted adult that has a preexisting, significant
relationship with the child or with a sibling of such child placed
pursuant to section 43-1311.02;
(h) Law enforcement agency means the police department or town
marshal in incorporated municipalities, the office of the sheriff in
unincorporated areas, and the Nebraska State Patrol;
(i) Member of a military family means an individual who is:
(i) Serving active duty service in the armed forces of the United
-3-

LB141 LB141
2025 2025
States, including any reserve component or the National Guard; or
(ii) Is a dependent, as defined in 50 U.S.C. 3911, of a person
described in subdivision (2)(i)(i) of this section;
(j) (i) Non-court-involved case means an ongoing case opened by the
department following a report of child abuse or neglect in which the
department has determined that ongoing services are required to maintain
the safety of a child or alleviate the risk of future abuse or neglect
and in which the family voluntarily engages in child protective services
without a filing in a juvenile court;
(k) (j) Out-of-home child abuse or neglect means child abuse or
neglect occurring outside of a child's family home, including in day care
homes, foster homes, day care centers, residential child-caring agencies
as defined in section 71-1926, other child care facilities or
institutions, and the community. Out-of-home child abuse or neglect also
includes cases in which the subject of the report of child abuse or
neglect is not a member of the child's household, no longer has access to
the child, is unknown, or cannot be identified;
(l) (k) Relative caregiver means a person with whom a child is
placed by the department and who is related to the child, or to a sibling
of such child pursuant to section 43-1311.02, by blood, marriage, or
adoption or, in the case of an Indian child, is an extended family member
as defined in section 43-1503;
(m) (l) Report means any communication received by the department or
a law enforcement agency pursuant to the Child Protection and Family
Safety Act that describes child abuse or neglect and contains sufficient
content to identify the child who is the alleged victim of child abuse or
neglect;
(n) (m) Review, Evaluate, and Decide Team means an internal team of
staff within the department and shall include no fewer than two
supervisors or administrators and two staff members knowledgeable on the
policies and practices of the department, including, but not limited to,
-4-

LB141 LB141
2025 2025
the structured review process. County attorneys, child advocacy centers,
or law enforcement agency personnel may attend team reviews upon request
of a party;
(o) (n) School employee means a person nineteen years of age or
older who is employed by a public, private, denominational, or parochial
school approved or accredited by the State Department of Education;
(p) (o) Student means a person less than nineteen years of age
enrolled in or attending a public, private, denominational, or parochial
school approved or accredited by the State Department of Education, or
who was such a person enrolled in or who attended such a school within
ninety days of any violation of section 28-316.01;
(q) (p) Traditional response means an investigation by a law
enforcement agency or the department pursuant to section 28-713 which
requires a formal determination of whether child abuse or neglect has
occurred; and
(r) (q) Subject of the report of child abuse or neglect or subject
of the report means the person or persons identified in the report as
responsible for the child abuse or neglect.
Sec. 2. (1) For purposes of this section:
(a) Military family advocacy program means the program established
by the United States Department of Defense and provided at a military
installation to address child abuse and neglect in military families; and
(b) Military installation has the same meaning as in section
79-2201.
(2) Upon receipt of a report of child abuse or neglect, the
department shall determine whether the subject of the report of child
abuse or neglect is a member of a military family. If the subject is a
member of the military family and the department does not determine the
report to be unfounded, the department shall notify the appropriate
military authorities and any appropriate military family advocacy program
of the report and share any pertinent information concerning the report.
-5-

LB141 LB141
2025 2025
(3) The department shall negotiate a memorandum of understanding
with any military family advocacy program at a military installation in
Nebraska with respect to the reporting required by this section. The
memorandum shall establish procedures and protocols for:
(a) Identifying the subject of a report of child abuse or neglect as
a member of a military family;
(b) Making the reports required by this section; and
(c) Maintaining confidentiality as required by state and federal
law.
(4) The department may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to
carry out this section.
Sec. 3. Section 28-713.01, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
28-713.01 (1) Upon completion of the investigation pursuant to
section 28-713:
(a) In situations of alleged out-of-home child abuse or neglect, the
person or persons having custody of the allegedly abused or neglected
child or children shall be given written notice of the results of the
investigation and any other information the law enforcement agency or
department deems necessary. Such notice and information shall be sent by
first-class mail;
(b) The subject of the report of child abuse or neglect shall be
given written notice of the determination of the case and whether the
subject of the report of child abuse or neglect will be entered into the
central registry of child protection cases maintained pursuant to section
28-718 under the criteria provided in section 28-720; and
(c) If the subject of the report of child abuse or neglect is a
school employee and the child is a student in the school to which such
school employee is assigned for work, the notice described in subdivision
(1)(b) of this section shall also be sent to the Commissioner of
Education; and .
-6-

LB141 LB141
2025 2025
(d) If the subject of the report of child abuse or neglect is a
member of a military family, the notice described in subdivision (1)(b)
of this section shall also be sent to the appropriate military
authorities and any military family advocacy program as provided in
section 2 of this act.
(2) If the subject of the report will be entered into the central
registry, the notice to the subject shall be sent by certified mail with
return receipt requested or first-class mail to the last-known address of
the subject of the report of child abuse or neglect and shall include:
(a) The nature of the report;
(b) The classification of the report under section 28-720;
(c) Notification of the right of the subject of the report of child
abuse or neglect to request the department to amend or expunge
identifying information from the report or to remove the substantiated
report from the central registry in accordance with section 28-723; and
(d) If the subject of the report of child abuse or neglect is a
minor child who is twelve years of age or older but younger than nineteen
years of age:
(i) Notification of the mandatory expungement hearing to be held
according to section 28-721, a waiver form to waive the hearing, and an
explanation of the hearing process;
(ii) An explanation of the implications of being entered in the
central registry as a subject;
(iii) Notification of any other procedures determined appropriate in
rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the department; and
(iv) Provision of a copy of all notice materials required to be
provided to the subject under this subsection to the minor child's
attorney of record, parent or guardian, and guardian ad litem, if
applicable.
(3) If the subject of the report will not be entered into the
central registry, the notice to the subject shall be sent by first-class
-7-

LB141 LB141
2025 2025
mail and shall include:
(a) The nature of the report; and
(b) The classification of the report under section 28-720.
Sec. 4. Section 28-726, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
28-726 Except as provided in this section and sections 28-722 and
81-3126, no person, official, or agency shall have access to information
in the tracking system of child protection cases maintained pursuant to
section 28-715 or in records in the central registry of child protection
cases maintained pursuant to section 28-718 unless in furtherance of
purposes directly connected with the administration of the Child
Protection and Family Safety Act. Such persons, officials, and agencies
having access to such information shall include, but not be limited to:
(1) A law enforcement agency investigating a report of known or
suspected child abuse or neglect;
(2) A county attorney in preparation of a child abuse or neglect
petition or termination of parental rights petition;
(3) A physician who has before him or her a child whom he or she
reasonably suspects may be abused or neglected;
(4) An agency having the legal responsibility or authorization to
care for, treat, or supervise an abused or neglected child or a parent, a
guardian, or other person responsible for the abused or neglected child's
welfare who is the subject of the report of child abuse or neglect;
(5) Any person engaged in bona fide research or auditing. No
information identifying the subjects of the report of child abuse or
neglect shall be made available to the researcher or auditor;
(6) The Foster Care Review Office and the designated local foster
care review board when the information relates to a child in a foster
care placement as defined in section 43-1301. The information provided to
the office and local board shall not include the name or identity of any
person making a report of suspected child abuse or neglect;
-8-

LB141 LB141
2025 2025
(7) The designated protection and advocacy system authorized
pursuant to the Developmental Disabilities Assistance and Bill of Rights
Act of 2000, 42 U.S.C. 15001, as the act existed on January 1, 2005, and
the Protection and Advocacy for Mentally Ill Individuals Act, 42 U.S.C.
10801, as the act existed on September 1, 2001, acting upon a complaint
received from or on behalf of a person with developmental disabilities or
mental illness;
(8) The person or persons having custody of the abused or neglected
child in situations of alleged out-of-home child abuse or neglect;
(9) The department, as required or authorized by state law, federal
law, federal regulation, or applicable federal program provisions and in
furtherance of its programs;
(10) A probation officer administering juvenile intake services
pursuant to section 29-2260.01, conducting court-ordered predispositional
investigations prior to disposition, or supervising a juvenile upon
disposition; and
(11) A child advocacy center pursuant to team protocols and in
connection with a specific case under review or investigation by a child
abuse and neglect investigation team or a child abuse and neglect
treatment team convened by a county attorney; and .
(12) Military authorities and military family advocacy programs as
provided in section 2 of this act.
Sec. 5. Original sections 28-710, 28-713.01, and 28-726, Revised
Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
-9-